Vermont statutes. Title 31 Recreation and Sports
Chapter 19. Leisure Time and Benefits for Elders

§ 1001.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living established by

3 V.S.A. § 3085a

.

“Passport” means a “Green Mountain Passport” as provided by section 1002 of this title.

“State-sponsored public event” means all events, exhibits, concerts, or museums fully supported by State funds to which the public is invited and all State parks, historical sites, and State lands normally open to the public. Overnight camping is excluded subject to regulations granted by the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

“Medical statistics” means information as to whether the passport holder has any chronic ailment or requires special medication.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 82

; amended

1989, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 9(a), (c);

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 60.

§ 1002.
Green Mountain Passport; eligibility.

Any person is eligible to obtain a Green Mountain Passport who:

is:

at least 62 years of age; or

a veteran of the uniformed services; and

is a resident of the State.

A Green Mountain Passport application shall be issued by the clerk of any town to a resident of that town who swears under oath that he or she meets the eligibility criteria established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. A fee of $2.00 will be charged at the time of application and shall be retained by the town issuing the passport. The town clerk shall issue the actual passport. Records shall be maintained as prescribed by law. Statistical information shall be furnished to the Commissioner upon request.

Forms for the issuance of passports shall be prepared by the Commissioner and provided in sufficient number by him or her to the clerk of each town.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 82

; amended

1975, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1977, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.);

1981, No. 29

;

1983, No. 67

;

1989, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 9(a), (c);

1993, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 53

, § 2, eff. May 29, 2013.

§ 1003.
Passport privileges.

Upon the exhibit of a Green Mountain Passport, the bearer shall be entitled to free admission to any fully State-sponsored public event and to any benefits offered by private entities pursuant to section 1004 of this title.

Upon the exhibit of the Green Mountain Passport, the bearer shall be entitled to one day’s admission to any fair, field days, or exposition that is either fully or partially supported by State grants or stipends, and that operates for more than one day. The management of such fair, field days, or exposition shall publicize the day on which the passports will be honored at least one week prior to the beginning of such an event.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 82

; amended

1975, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1004.
Private cooperation.

The Secretary of Human Services may instruct the Commissioner to prepare a decal containing a suitable symbol and make them available to private businesses cooperating in the passport program for display at each such business establishment.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 82

; amended

1989, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 9(c);

1993, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1005.
Misuse of passport; forgery; penalty.

A person who makes any false statement on an application for a passport or who possesses or uses a passport issued to another or falsely makes, alters, forges, or counterfeits a passport shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned for not more than six months or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 82

.